Massachusetts, session 194th, H3904.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding clause 41C of section 5 of chapter 59 or any other general
or special law to the contrary, with respect to real property in the City of Boston the following
factors determining exemption for real property under clause 41C of section 5 of chapter 59 shall
be adjusted as follows: (1) increasing the sum of $500 contained in the first sentence of clause
41C to $1,500; (2) increasing the amounts contained in subclause (B) of said first sentence
whenever they appear in said subclause from $13,000 dollars and from $15,000 dollars to fifty
percent of Area Median Income as adjusted for household size, as is published annually by the
U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, as required by Section 8 of the Federal
Housing Act of 1937 (42 USC Section 1437f), as amended, and the relevant year of the
calculation shall be the most recent figure available as of July 1 of the start of the fiscal year to
which the exemption is sought; and (3) increasing the amounts contained in subclause (C) of said
first sentence whenever they appear in said subclause from $28,000 dollars to not more than
of 2

$80,000 and from $30,000 to not more than $110,000. These adjustments shall not be further
modified by the second sentence of clause 41C of section 5 of chapter 59.
SECTION 2.
The provisions of this act are severable and if any provision, or portion thereof, should be
held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, such
unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions, which remain in full
force and effect.
SECTION 3.
This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2